en: Cocktail mix variety: Bloody Mary; Cosmopolitan; Daiquiri; Mai Tai; Margarita; Martini; Mimosa; Mojito; Old Fashioned; Piña Colada; Sangria; Sex on the Beach; Singapore Sling; Tequila Sunrise; Tom Collins; Whiskey Sour; Other
de: Cocktailmix-Sorte: Bloody Mary; Cosmopolitan; Daiquiri; Mai Tai; Margarita; Martini; Mimosa; Mojito; Old Fashioned; Piña Colada; Sangria; Sex on the Beach; Singapore Sling; Tequila Sunrise; Tom Collins; Whiskey Sour; Andere
ro-RO: Varietate de mixuri de cocktailuri: Bloody Mary; Cosmopolitan; Daiquiri; Mai Tai; Margarita; Martini; Mimosa; Mojito; Old Fashioned; Piña Colada; Sangria; Sex on the Beach; Singapore Sling; Tequila Sunrise; Tom Collins; Whiskey Sour; Altele
zh-CN: 鸡尾酒预调液种类: 血腥玛丽; 大都会; 代基里; 迈泰; 玛格丽特; 马提尼; 含羞草; 莫吉托; 古典; 椰林飘香; 桑格利亚; 性感沙滩; 新加坡司令; 龙舌兰日出; 汤姆科林斯; 威士忌酸; 其他
it: Varietà di miscele per cocktail: Bloody Mary; Cosmopolitan; Daiquiri; Mai Tai; Margarita; Martini; Mimosa; Mojito; Old Fashioned; Piña Colada; Sangria; Sex on the Beach; Singapore Sling; Tequila Sunrise; Tom Collins; Whiskey Sour; Altro
nb: Cocktailmiks-utvalg: Bloody Mary; Cosmopolitan; Daiquiri; Mai Tai; Margarita; Martini; Mimosa; Mojito; Old Fashioned; Piña Colada; Sangria; Sex on the Beach; Singapore Sling; Tequila Sunrise; Tom Collins; Whiskey Sour; Annet
sl-SI: Različne mešanice za koktajle: Bloody Mary; Cosmopolitan; Daiquiri; Mai Tai; Margarita; Martini; Mimoza; Mojito; Old Fashioned; Piña Colada; Sangria; Sex on the Beach; Singapore Sling; Tequila Sunrise; Tom Collins; Whiskey Sour; Drugo
vi: Loại hỗn hợp cocktail: Bloody Mary; Cosmopolitan; Daiquiri; Mai Tai; Margarita; Martini; Mimosa; Mojito; Old Fashioned; Piña Colada; Sangria; Sex on the Beach; Singapore Sling; Tequila Sunrise; Tom Collins; Whiskey Sour; Khác
es: Variedad de la mezcla para cóctel: Bloody Mary; Cosmopolitan; Daiquiri; Mai Tai; Margarita; Martini; Mimosa; Mojito; Old Fashioned; Piña Colada; Sangría; Sex on the Beach; Singapore Sling; Tequila Sunrise; Tom Collins; Whiskey Sour; Otro
el: Ποικιλία μειγμάτων κοκτέιλ: Bloody Mary; Cosmopolitan; Daiquiri; Mai Tai; Margarita; Martini; Mimosa; Mojito; Old Fashioned; Piña Colada; Sangria; Sex on the Beach; Singapore Sling; Tequila Sunrise; Tom Collins; Whiskey Sour; Άλλο
ja: カクテルミックスの種類: ブラッディ・マリー; コスモポリタン; ダイキリ; マイタイ; マルガリータ; マティーニ; ミモザ; モヒート; オールド・ファッションド; ピニャ・コラーダ; サングリア; セックス・オン・ザ・ビーチ; シンガポール・スリング; テキーラ・サンライズ; トム・コリンズ; ウイスキー・サワー; その他
da: Udvalg af cocktailblandinger: Bloody Mary; Cosmopolitan; Daiquiri; Mai Tai; Margarita; Martini; Mimosa; Mojito; Old Fashioned; Piña Colada; Sangria; Sex on the Beach; Singapore Sling; Tequila Sunrise; Tom Collins; Whiskey Sour; Andet
th: ค็อกเทลมิกซ์หลากหลายชนิด: บลัดดีแมรี; คอสโมโพลิแทน; ไดคิวรี; ไหมไทย; มาร์การิตา; มาร์ตินี; มิโมซา; โมฮิโต; โอลด์แฟชั่น; พินาโคลาดา; แซงเกรีย; เซ็กซ์ออนเดอะบีช; สิงคโปร์สลิง; เตกีลาซันไรส์; ทอมคอลลินส์; วิสกี้ซาวร์; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 雞尾酒混合料種類: 血腥瑪麗; 柯夢波丹; 黛綺麗; 邁泰; 瑪格麗特; 馬丁尼; 蜜摩莎; 莫西多; 古典雞尾酒; 鳳梨可樂達; 桑格利亞; 性感海灘; 新加坡司令; 龍舌蘭日出; 湯姆可林斯; 威士忌沙瓦; 其他
tr: Kokteyl karışımı çeşidi: Bloody Mary; Cosmopolitan; Daiquiri; Mai Tai; Margarita; Martini; Mimosa; Mojito; Old Fashioned; Piña Colada; Sangria; Sex on the Beach; Singapore Sling; Tequila Sunrise; Tom Collins; Whiskey Sour; Diğer
fr: Variété de mélange à cocktail: Bloody Mary; Cosmopolitan; Daiquiri; Mai Tai; Margarita; Martini; Mimosa; Mojito; Old Fashioned; Piña Colada; Sangria; Sex on the Beach; Singapore Sling; Tequila Sunrise; Tom Collins; Whiskey Sour; Autre
cs: Druh koktejlové směsi: Bloody Mary; Cosmopolitan; Daiquiri; Mai Tai; Margarita; Martini; Mimosa; Mojito; Old Fashioned; Piña Colada; Sangria; Sex on the Beach; Singapore Sling; Tequila Sunrise; Tom Collins; Whiskey Sour; Jiný
ko: 칵테일 믹스 종류: 블러디 메리; 코스모폴리탄; 다이키리; 마이타이; 마가리타; 마티니; 미모사; 모히토; 올드 패션드; 피나 콜라다; 샹그리아; 섹스 온 더 비치; 싱가포르 슬링; 데킬라 선라이즈; 톰 콜린스; 위스키 사워; 기타
lt-LT: Kokteilių mišinio rūšis: Kruvinoji Merė; Cosmopolitan; Daiquiri; Mai Tai; Margarita; Martini; Mimoza; Mojito; Old Fashioned; Piña Colada; Sangrija; Sex on the Beach; Singapore Sling; Tequila Sunrise; Tom Collins; Whiskey Sour; Kita
ru: Разновидность коктейльной смеси: Кровавая Мэри; Космополитен; Дайкири; Май Тай; Маргарита; Мартини; Мимоза; Мохито; Олд Фешен; Пина Колада; Сангрия; Секс на пляже; Сингапурский слинг; Текила Санрайз; Том Коллинз; Виски Сауэр; Другое
pt-PT: variedade de misturas para cocktails: Bloody Mary; Cosmopolitan; Daiquiri; Mai Tai; Margarita; Martini; Mimosa; Mojito; Old Fashioned; Piña Colada; Sangria; Sex on the Beach; Singapore Sling; Tequila Sunrise; Tom Collins; Whiskey Sour; Outra
hu: Koktélkeverék választék: Bloody Mary; Cosmopolitan; Daiquiri; Mai Tai; Margarita; Martini; Mimosa; Mojito; Old Fashioned; Piña Colada; Sangria; Sex on the Beach; Singapore Sling; Tequila Sunrise; Tom Collins; Whiskey Sour; Egyéb
sk-SK: Výber koktailových zmesí: Bloody Mary; Cosmopolitan; Daiquiri; Mai Tai; Margarita; Martini; Mimosa; Mojito; Old Fashioned; Piña Colada; Sangria; Sex on the Beach; Singapore Sling; Tequila Sunrise; Tom Collins; Whiskey Sour; Iné
nl: Cocktailmix variant: Bloody Mary; Cosmopolitan; Daiquiri; Mai Tai; Margarita; Martini; Mimosa; Mojito; Old Fashioned; Piña Colada; Sangria; Sex on the Beach; Singapore Sling; Tequila Sunrise; Tom Collins; Whiskey Sour; Overig
hr-HR: Raznovrsne mješavine za koktele: Bloody Mary; Cosmopolitan; Daiquiri; Mai Tai; Margarita; Martini; Mimoza; Mojito; Old Fashioned; Piña Colada; Sangria; Sex on the Beach; Singapore Sling; Tequila Sunrise; Tom Collins; Whiskey Sour; Ostalo
pl: Odmiana mieszanki koktajlowej: Bloody Mary; Cosmopolitan; Daiquiri; Mai Tai; Margarita; Martini; Mimosa; Mojito; Old Fashioned; Piña Colada; Sangria; Sex on the Beach; Singapore Sling; Tequila Sunrise; Tom Collins; Whiskey Sour; Inny
sv: Typ av cocktailmix: Bloody Mary; Cosmopolitan; Daiquiri; Mai Tai; Margarita; Martini; Mimosa; Mojito; Old Fashioned; Piña Colada; Sangria; Sex on the Beach; Singapore Sling; Tequila Sunrise; Tom Collins; Whiskey Sour; Övrigt
fi: Cocktailsekoitusten valikoima: Bloody Mary; Cosmopolitan; Daiquiri; Mai Tai; Margarita; Martini; Mimosa; Mojito; Old Fashioned; Piña Colada; Sangria; Sex on the Beach; Singapore Sling; Tequila Sunrise; Tom Collins; Whiskey Sour; Muu
bg-BG: Разнообразие от коктейлни миксове: Блъди Мери; Космополитън; Дайкири; Май Тай; Маргарита; Мартини; Мимоза; Мохито; Олд Фешън; Пиня Колада; Сангрия; Секс на плажа; Сингапур Слинг; Текила Сънрайз; Том Колинс; Уиски Сауър; Други
pt-BR: Variedade de mistura para coquetéis: Bloody Mary; Cosmopolitan; Daiquiri; Mai Tai; Margarita; Martini; Mimosa; Mojito; Old Fashioned; Piña Colada; Sangria; Sex on the Beach; Singapore Sling; Tequila Sunrise; Tom Collins; Whiskey Sour; Outras